Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-475
Opiates; receipt; identification required.

(1) Unless the individual taking receipt of dispensed opiates listed in Schedule II, III, or IV of section 28-405 is personally and positively known to the pharmacist or dispensing practitioner, the individual shall display a valid driver's or operator's license, a state identification card, a military identification card, an alien registration card, or a passport as proof of identification.

(2) This section does not apply to a patient who is a resident of a health care facility licensed pursuant to the Health Care Facility Licensure Act.

Laws 2018, LB931, § 5.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.